Utah statutes.
41-6a-1712.   Destructive or injurious materials on highways -- Throwing
lighted material from moving vehicle -- Enforcement officers.
(1)  A person may not throw, deposit, or discard, or permit to be dropped,
thrown, deposited, or discarded on any public road or highway in the state,
whether under state, county, municipal, or federal ownership, any plastic
container, glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, barbed wire, boards,
trash or garbage, paper or paper products, or any other substance which would
or could:
(a)  create a safety or health hazard on the public road or highway; or
(b)  mar or impair the scenic aspect or beauty of the public road or highway.
(2)  A person who drops, throws, deposits, or discards, or permits to be
dropped, thrown, deposited, or discarded, on any public road or highway any
destructive, injurious, or unsightly material shall:
(a)  immediately remove the material or cause it to be removed; and
(b)  deposit the material in a receptacle designed to receive the material.
(3)  A person distributing commercial handbills, leaflets, or other
advertising shall take whatever measures are reasonably necessary to keep the
material from littering public roadways or highways.
(4)  A person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a public road or
highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped from the
vehicle on the road or highway.
(5)  A person may not throw any lighted material from a moving vehicle.
(6)  Except as provided in Section 72-7-409, any person transporting loose
cargo by truck, trailer, or other motor vehicle shall secure the cargo in a
reasonable manner to prevent the cargo from littering or spilling on both
public and private property or public roadways.
(7)  A law enforcement officer as defined in Section 53-13-103, within the law
enforcement officer's jurisdiction:
(a)  shall enforce the provisions of this section;
(b)  may issue citations to a person who violates any of the provisions of
this section; and
(c)  may serve and execute all warrants, citations, and other process issued
by any court in enforcing this section.
(8)  A municipality within its corporate limits and a county outside of
incorporated municipalities may enact local ordinances to carry out the
provisions of this section.
